Washington statutes.
RCW 2.08.064

Judges—Benton, Franklin, Clallam, Jefferson, Snohomish, Asotin, Columbia, Garfield, Cowlitz, Klickitat, and Skamania counties.

There shall be in the counties of Benton and Franklin jointly, seven judges of the superior court; in the county of Clallam, three judges of the superior court; in the county of Jefferson, one judge of the superior court; in the county of Snohomish, 17 judges of the superior court; in the counties of Asotin, Columbia and Garfield jointly, one judge of the superior court; in the county of Cowlitz, five judges of the superior court; in the counties of Klickitat and Skamania jointly, one judge of the superior court.

[ 2022 c 46 s 1; 2013 c 142 s 1; 2006 c 20 s 1; 2003 c 96 s 2; 1997 c 347 s 1; 1993 sp.s. c 14 s 1; 1992 c 189 s 4; 1989 c 328 s 3; 1985 c 357 s 3; 1982 c 139 s 2; 1981 c 65 s 1; 1979 ex.s. c 202 s 3; 1977 ex.s. c 311 s 3; 1974 ex.s. c 192 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 83 s 3; 1969 ex.s. c 213 s 2; 1967 ex.s. c 84 s 3; 1963 c 35 s 1; 1961 c 67 s 2; 1955 c 19 s 2; 1951 c 125 s 6. Prior: 1945 c 20 s 1, part; 1927 c 135 s 1, part; 1925 ex.s. c 132 s 1; 1917 c 97 ss 1-3; 1911 c 40 s 1; 1911 c 129 ss 1, 2, part; 1907 c 79 s 1, part; 1905 c 36 s 1, part; 1895 c 89 s 1, part; 1891 c 68 ss 1, 3, part; 1890 p 341 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 11045-1d, part; RRS s 11045-1, part.]

NOTES:

Additional judicial positions in Snohomish county subject to approval and agreement—Effective date—2022 c 46: "(1) The additional judicial positions created in section 1 of this act are effective only if Snohomish county, through its duly constituted legislative authority, documents its approval of the additional positions and its agreement that it will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the expenses of the additional judicial positions as provided by state law and the state Constitution.

(2) The judicial positions created in section 1 of this act are effective July 1, 2022." [ 2022 c 46 s 2.]

Additional judicial position in Benton and Franklin counties subject to approval and agreement—2013 c 142: "The additional judicial position created by section 1 of this act in Benton and Franklin counties jointly becomes effective only if the counties, through their duly constituted legislative authority, document their approval of the additional position and their agreement that they will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the expenses of the additional judicial position as provided by statute." [ 2013 c 142 s 2.]

Additional judicial positions in Clallam and Cowlitz counties subject to approval and agreement—2006 c 20: "The additional judicial positions created by section 1 of this act in Clallam and Cowlitz counties are effective only if each county through its duly constituted legislative authority documents its approval of the additional position and its agreement that it will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the expenses of the existing and additional judicial positions as provided by statute and the state Constitution." [ 2006 c 20 s 2.]

Effective dates for additional judicial positions—2003 c 96: See note following RCW 2.08.062.

Starting dates of additional judicial positions in Snohomish county—1997 c 347: "The additional judicial positions created for the county of Snohomish under section 1 of this act are effective January 1, 1998, but the actual starting dates for these positions may be established by the Snohomish county council upon request of the superior court and by the recommendation of the Snohomish county executive." [ 1997 c 347 s 2.]

Additional judicial position in Cowlitz county subject to approval and agreement—1993 sp.s. c 14: "The additional judicial position created by section 1 of this act shall be effective only if Cowlitz county through its duly constituted legislative authority documents its approval of the additional position and its agreement that it will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the expenses of the additional judicial position as provided by statute." [ 1993 sp.s. c 14 s 2.]

Effective dates—Additional judicial positions subject to approval and agreement—1992 c 189: See notes following RCW 2.08.061.

Intent—Additional judicial positions subject to approval and agreement—Effective dates for additional judicial positions—1989 c 328: See notes following RCW 2.08.061.

Effective dates—Additional judicial positions in Pierce, Clark, and Snohomish counties subject to approval and agreement—1989 c 328; 1985 c 357: See note following RCW 2.08.061.

Additional judicial positions in Clallam and Jefferson counties subject to approval and agreement—1982 c 139: "The additional judicial positions created by section 2 of this 1982 act in Clallam and Jefferson counties shall be effective only if, prior to April 1, 1982, each county through its duly constituted legislative authority documents its approval of the additional positions and its agreement that it will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the expenses of such additional judicial positions as provided by statute." [ 1982 c 139 s 3.]

Additional judicial positions in Ferry, Stevens, and Pend Oreille district subject to approval and agreement—1982 c 139; 1981 c 65: "The additional judicial position created by this 1981 act in the joint Ferry, Stevens, and Pend Oreille judicial district shall be effective only if each county in the judicial district through its duly constituted legislative authority documents its approval of the additional position and its agreement that it and the other counties comprising the judicial district will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the expenses of such additional judicial position as provided by statute. As among the counties, the amount of the judge's salary to be paid by each county shall be in accordance with RCW 2.08.110 unless otherwise agreed upon by the counties involved." [ 1982 c 139 s 1; 1981 c 65 s 3.]

Effective date—1977 ex.s. c 311: See note following RCW 2.08.061.